Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 3.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20109-647
Lottery; time limitation.

No lottery shall be conducted between the hours of 1 a.m.
and 6 a.m., except that if
alcoholic liquor is allowed to be sold later than 1 a.m. pursuant to a vote
under subdivision (1)(b) of section 53-179, no lottery shall be conducted
between the hour established pursuant to such vote and 6 a.m. within the area
affected by the vote.

Laws 1989, LB 767, § 94;

Laws 2010, LB861, § 3.
July 15, 2010